Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 8. Commercial Fishing Loan Act.

Administrative Code. —

For commercial fishing loans, see 3 AAC 80.

Legislative history reports. —

For House Resources Committee report in connection with ch. 134, SLA 1972 (SCS CSHB 102 am FCC), see 1971 House Journal, p. 399; for House Finance Committee report, see 1972 House Journal, p. 554; for legislative letter of intent in connection with the amendments to this article made by ch. 7, SLA 1983 (SCS CSHB 15(Fin)), see 1983 House Journal, p. 432, or 1983 Senate Journal, p. 621.

Sec. 16.10.300.
Declaration of policy.

It is the policy of the state, under AS

16.10.300

—

16.10.370

, to promote the rehabilitation of the state’s fisheries, the development of a predominantly resident fishery, and the continued maintenance of commercial fishing gear and vessels throughout the state by means of long-term low interest loans.

History.

(§ 1 ch 134 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 54 SLA 1973; am § 1 ch 128 SLA 1975)

Sec. 16.10.310.
Powers of the department.

The department may

make loans

to individual commercial fishermen who have been state residents for a continuous period of two years immediately preceding the date of application for a loan under AS

16.10.300

—

16.10.370

, who have had an annual crewmember or commercial fishing license under AS

16.05.480

or a permit under AS 16.43 for the year immediately preceding the date of application and any other two of the past five years, and who actively participated in the fishery during those periods

for the purchase of entry permits;

to upgrade existing vessels and gear for the purpose of improving the quality of Alaska seafood products; or

for propulsion engine or generator engine replacements on existing vessels for the purpose of improving fuel efficiency;

to an individual for the repair, restoration, or upgrading of existing vessels and gear, for the purchase of entry permits and gear, and for the construction and purchase of vessels, if the individual has been a state resident for a continuous period of two years immediately preceding the date of application for a loan under AS

16.10.300

—

16.10.370

, is not eligible for financing from a state financial institution as defined in AS

06.01.050

, a federally chartered financial institution, or the Commercial Fishing and Agricultural Bank, and

because of lack of training or lack of employment opportunities in the area of residence, does not have occupational opportunities available other than commercial fishing; or

is economically dependent on commercial fishing for a livelihood and for whom commercial fishing has been a traditional way of life in Alaska;

for the purchase of quota shares for fisheries in or off the state by individual commercial fishermen who

have been state residents for a continuous period of two years immediately preceding the date of application for a loan under AS 16.10.300 — 16.10.370;

for any two of the past five years, possessed an annual crewmember or commercial fishing license under AS

16.05.480

or a permit under AS 16.43 and actively participated in a fishery for which the license or permit was issued;

qualify as transferees for quota shares under applicable law; and

are not eligible for financing from other recognized commercial lending institutions to purchase quota shares;

to an individual commercial fisherman to satisfy past due federal tax obligations, if the fisherman has been a state resident for a continuous period of two years immediately preceding the date of application for the loan, has filed past and current federal tax returns with the federal government, has executed an agreement with the federal government for repayment of past due federal tax obligations, and either

because of lack of training or lack of employment opportunities in the area of residence, does not have occupational opportunities available other than commercial fishing; or

is economically dependent on commercial fishing for a livelihood and for whom commercial fishing has been a traditional way of life in Alaska;

for the purchase of fishing quota shares by a community quota entity eligible under federal statute or regulation to purchase the fishing quota shares if the community quota entity is not eligible or qualified for financing from other recognized commercial lending institutions to purchase the fishing quota shares;

to an individual for the upgrade of existing tender vessels and gear to improve the quality of Alaska seafood products, if the individual has been a state resident for a continuous period of two years immediately preceding the date of application for a loan under AS 16.10.300 — 16.10.370;

designate agents and delegate its powers to them as necessary;

adopt regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of AS 16.10.300 — 16.10.370, including regulations to establish reasonable fees for services provided;

establish amortization plans for repayment of loans, which may include extensions for poor fishing seasons or for adverse market conditions for Alaska products;

enter into agreements with private lending institutions, other state agencies, or agencies of the federal government to carry out the purposes of AS 16.10.300 — 16.10.370;

enter into agreements with other agencies or organizations to create an outreach program to make loans under AS 16.10.300 — 16.10.370 in rural areas of the state;

allow an assumption of a loan if

the applicant has been a state resident for a continuous period of two years immediately preceding the date of the request for an assumption; and

approval of the assumption would be consistent with the purposes of AS 16.10.300; an applicant for a loan assumption may not be disqualified because the applicant does not meet the loan eligibility requirements of (1) of this subsection;

prequalify loan applicants for a limited entry permit loan or a quota shares loan and charge a fee not to exceed $200 for prequalification;

charge and collect the fees established under this subsection;

refinance a debt obligation incurred by a borrower or borrowers under this section if the borrower or borrowers otherwise qualify for a loan under AS 16.10.300 — 16.10.370;

refinance debt obligations, not to exceed $200,000, incurred by a borrower or borrowers for the purchase of a commercial fishing vessel or gear if the borrower or borrowers otherwise qualify for a loan under AS 16.10.300 — 16.10.370; the department may collect a refinancing loan origination charge as provided by regulation.

[Repealed, § 34 ch 79 SLA 1985.]

In determining whether an individual commercial fisherman is reasonably likely to be able to repay a loan made under AS

16.10.300

—

16.10.370

, the commissioner shall consider the individual commercial fisherman’s income from commercial fishing and from all other sources.

[Repealed, § 9 ch 62 SLA 1994.]

[Repealed, § 4 ch 12 SLA 2000.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 134 SLA 1972; am § 2 ch 54 SLA 1973; am § 2 ch 128 SLA 1975; am § 2 ch 190 SLA 1976; am § 13 ch 105 SLA 1977; am §§ 1, 2 ch 83 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 72 SLA 1979; am § 7 ch 113 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 7 SLA 1983; am §§ 1, 2, 34 ch 79 SLA 1985; am §§ 21, 22 ch 36 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 54 SLA 1993; am §§ 1, 3, 9 ch 62 SLA 1994; am § 2 ch 73 SLA 1994; am §§ 1—4 ch 127 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 56 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 38 SLA 2004; am § 4 ch 59 SLA 2005; am § 1 ch 85 SLA 2005; am § 1 ch 100 SLA 2006; am § 1 ch 120 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1997, to reconcile §§ 2 and 10, ch. 62, SLA 1994 with § 2, ch. 73, SLA 1994 the provisions of (a)(1)(C) and the references to a quota share loan in (a)(8) added by ch. 73, SLA 1994 were retained despite the delayed reenactment of subsection (a) by § 2, ch. 62, SLA 1994. For the same reason, “to” was inserted at the beginning of (a)(1)(A) and (B).

Cross references. —

For legislative purpose and intent in connection with the 1994 amendment of (a) of this section, see § 1, ch. 73, SLA 1994 in the Temporary and Special Acts. For temporary provisions, see secs. 64 - 67, ch. 113, SLA 1982.

Administrative Code. —

For repossessed property, see 3 AAC 77.

For commercial fishing loans, see 3 AAC 80.

Legislative history reports. —

For House letter of intent in connection with the 1994 amendment of (a) of this section by § 2, ch. 73, SLA 1994 (HCS CSSB 132(RES)), see 1994 House Journal 2253.

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 38, SLA 2004 (SB 387) amending subsection (a) of this section, see 2004 Senate Journal 2871-2872.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Five-year residency requirements provided for in subparagraphs (a)(1)(A), (a)(1)(B), and (a)(1)(C) (now repealed) of this section were unconstitutional, since the state’s interest in ensuring that only bona fide resident commercial fishermen qualify for the commercial fishing loan program did not outweigh the infringement on the right of less-than-five-year residents to share in the economic benefits of the program. November 26, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen. (opinion issued prior to 1983 amendment).

Sec. 16.10.315.
Allocation of loans. [Repealed, § 4 ch 100 SLA 2006.]

Sec. 16.10.320.
Limitations on loans.

Except as permitted in (h) and (l) of this section, a loan under AS

16.10.300

—

16.10.370

may not exceed a term of 15 years, except for extensions under AS

16.10.310(a)(4)

;

may not bear interest

exceeding the prime rate, as defined by AS

44.88.599

, plus two percentage points;

at a rate of more than 10 1/2 percent a year; or

at a rate that is less than the cost of funds to the state;

must be secured by a first priority lien and appropriate security agreement;

may not exceed 80 percent of the appraised value of the collateral used to secure the loan; and

may not be made to a person who has a past due child support obligation established by court order or by the child support services agency under AS

25.27.160

—

25.27.220

at the time of application.

A lien in favor of the state is not required for loans guaranteed fully by the federal government under 46 U.S.C. 1271 — 1279b (Federal Ship Financing Act of 1972), as amended. In the case of a security agreement given to secure a loan made under AS

16.10.300

—

16.10.370

and covering a vessel documented under the laws of the United States and so long as 46 U.S.C. 911-984 (Ship Mortgage Act, 1920) as amended, and 46 U.S.C. 801-842 (Shipping Act, 1916), as amended, remain ambiguous with respect to whether or not a state or state agency qualifies as a citizen of the United States for purposes of those Acts, the first lien requirement of this section may be satisfied by the recordation and endorsement of a first preferred ship mortgage under 46 U.S.C. 911-984, and by perfection of a security interest under AS 45.29 (Uniform Commercial Code — Secured Transactions), if the approval of the Secretary of Transportation is obtained under 46 U.S.C. 839 for the transfer to the department of the interest in a vessel documented under the laws of the United States. In the case of a security agreement given to secure a loan made under AS

16.10.300

—

16.10.370

and covering a vessel documented under the laws of the United States, the first lien requirement of this section may also be satisfied by use of a trust deed and bond issued under it, if the trustee is a citizen of the United States and obtains a first preferred ship mortgage on the vessel under 46 U.S.C. 911 — 984, and the approval of the Secretary of Transportation is obtained under 46 U.S.C. 839 and 961 for the transfer of the bond or bonds to the department if the trustee is not a trustee approved by the Secretary of Transportation under 46 U.S.C. 808, 835, and 961.

[Repealed, § 72 ch 113 SLA 1982.]

The total of balances outstanding on loans made to a borrower under AS

16.10.310(a)

(1)(A) may not exceed $400,000. The total of balances outstanding on loans made to a borrower under AS

16.10.310(a)

(1)(B) may not exceed $200,000. The total of balances outstanding on loans made to a borrower under AS

16.10.310(a)(1)(C)

may not exceed $400,000. The total of balances outstanding on loans made to a borrower under AS

16.10.310(a)(1)(D)

to satisfy past due federal tax obligations may not exceed $35,000. The total of balances outstanding on loans made under AS

16.10.310(a)(1)(E)

may not exceed $2,000,000 for each community eligible under federal statute or regulation to establish or participate in the establishment of a community quota entity. The total of balances outstanding on loans made to a borrower under AS

16.10.310(a)(1)(F)

may not exceed $400,000. Excluding loans made under AS

16.10.310(a)(1)(E)

, the total of balances outstanding on all loans, including debt refinancing under AS 16.10.310(a), made to a borrower under AS

16.10.300

—

16.10.370

may not exceed $400,000.

Two or more individual commercial fishermen who each satisfy the requirements specified in AS

16.10.310(a)(1)(B)

may jointly, whether operating as a corporation, partnership, joint venture, or otherwise, obtain a commercial fishing loan for the repair, restoration, or upgrading of an existing vessel and gear, for the purchase of gear, and for the construction or the purchase of a fishing vessel. Loans granted under this subsection may not exceed the amount specified in (d) of this section multiplied by the number of qualified commercial fishermen applying for the loan.

[Repealed, § 34 ch 79 SLA 1985.]

[Repealed, § 72 ch 113 SLA 1982.]

A loan for an entry permit under AS

16.10.310(a)(1)(B)

may be made for up to 100 percent of the appraised value of the collateral used to secure the loan if the borrower demonstrates that (1) the borrower has at least three years of experience as a commercial fisherman in the fishery to which the entry permit applies; and (2) the borrower has not owned an Alaska limited entry permit in the year immediately preceding the application for the loan. In this subsection “three years of experience as a commercial fisherman in the fishery” means that for an accumulated total of three fishing seasons in the same fishery the borrower has actively participated in the commercial harvest of fish under the direction of a limited entry permit holder.

If a loan is made to a borrower under AS

16.10.310(a)(1)(A)

, a subsequent loan may not be made to the borrower under AS

16.10.310(a)(1)

(B), unless the loan requested under AS

16.10.310(a)(1)

is for propulsion engine or generator engine replacement on an existing vessel for the purpose of improving fuel efficiency or is for the purchase of an entry permit. If a loan is made to a borrower under AS

16.10.310(a)(1)(B)

, a subsequent loan may be made to the borrower under AS

16.10.310(a)(1)(A)

if the total of the balance outstanding on loans received by the borrower under AS 16.10.310(a)(1)(A) and (B) does not exceed $400,000.

All principal and interest payments, and any money chargeable to principal or interest that is collected through liquidation by foreclosure or other process, on loans made under AS

16.10.300

—

16.10.370

, shall be paid into the commercial fishing revolving loan fund.

Two or more individuals who each satisfy the requirement specified in AS

16.10.310(a)(1)(F)

may jointly, whether operating as a corporation, partnership, joint venture, or otherwise, obtain a commercial fishing loan, not to exceed $300,000, for the upgrade of existing tender vessels and gear to improve the quality of Alaska seafood products.

Until a community quota entity has used loans under this subsection to purchase fishing quota shares cumulatively authorizing a total take of 50,000 pounds, a loan or a portion of a loan made to that community quota entity under AS

16.10.310(a)(1)(E)

may not exceed 95 percent of the appraised value of the collateral used to secure the loan or a portion of the loan. A loan to a community quota entity under AS

16.10.310(a)(1)(E)

may not exceed a term of 25 years, except for extensions under AS

16.10.310(a)(4)

;

may not, alone or in combination with other loans to the community quota entity under AS

16.10.310(a)(4)

, exceed $1,000,000 in loans to one community quota entity;

may have terms that allow for a community quota entity to defer interest payments for up to two years; and

is not eligible for refinancing by the department.

In this section, “cost of funds” means the true interest cost expressed as a rate based on the prime rate plus one percentage point plus an additional percentage determined by the department to represent risk of loss, term of credit facility, the allocable expense of operation, cost of issuance, and loan servicing costs.

History.

(§ 1 ch 134 SLA 1972; am § 3 ch 54 SLA 1973; am § 3 ch 128 SLA 1975; am § 1 ch 154 SLA 1977; am § 3 ch 83 SLA 1978; am §§ 2 — 7 ch 72 SLA 1979; am §§ 8 — 12, 72 ch 113 SLA 1982; am §§ 4 — 7, 34 ch 79 SLA 1985; am § 4 ch 116 SLA 1986; am § 23 ch 36 SLA 1990; am § 4 ch 62 SLA 1994; am §§ 3, 4 ch 73 SLA 1994; am § 27 ch 35 SLA 2003; am § 2 ch 56 SLA 2003; am § 2 ch 38 SLA 2004; am §§ 2, 3 ch 85 SLA 2005; am §§ 2, 3 ch 100 SLA 2006; am § 2 ch 120 SLA 2010; am §§ 1, 2 ch 47 SLA 2012; am §§ 1 — 4 ch 58 SLA 2012; am § 1 ch 99 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1987, “Secretary of Transportation” was substituted for “Secretary of Commerce” by the revisor in three places in subsection (b) to reflect a change in federal law.

In 2000, “AS 45.29” was substituted for “AS 45.09” in accordance with § 35, ch. 113, SLA 2000.

In 2004, “child support enforcement division” was changed to ‘child support services agency‘ in (a) of this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004, and to correct a manifest error.

Cross references. —

For provision prescribing the applicability of the 2012 amendments to (d) of this section, see § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2012, in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For commercial fishing loans, see 3 AAC 80.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective November 29, 2018, in (d), substituted “may not exceed $400,000” for “may not exceed $300,000” three times, deleted “for the purchase of an entry permit and may not exceed $100,000 for all other loans under that subparagraph” at the end of the second sentence.

Editor’s notes. —

Following the positive law codification of 46 U.S.C., the citations to 46 U.S.C. 911 - 46 U.S.C. 984, 46 U.S.C. 1271 - 46 U.S.C. 1279b, and 46 U.S.C. 801 - 46 U.S.C. 842 in subsection (b) of this section are obsolete.
For further information, refer to the table in 46 U.S.C. showing the disposition of former sections of Title 46 or Title 46 Appendix.
For provisions of the Federal Ship Financing Act, see 46 U.S.C. 53701 et seq; for provisions of the Ship Mortgage Act, see 46 U.S.C. 31301 et seq.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 38, SLA 2004 (SB 387) amending subsection (d) of this section, see 2004 Senate Journal 2871-2872.

Sec. 16.10.325.
Guarantors.

A person may act as guarantor if the borrower has insufficient collateral to secure a loan for the purposes described in AS

16.10.310(a)(1)(B)

or (C). The loan agreement shall specifically describe the property of the guarantor to be used as collateral by the borrower and shall be signed by the guarantor and the borrower. The department shall provide the guarantor with a copy of all notices sent to the borrower by the department. If the loan is for the purchase of an entry permit or quota shares, the guaranty by the guarantor may not constitute a lien, mortgage, or encumbrance on or pledge of the entry permit or quota shares.

History.

(§ 13 ch 113 SLA 1982; am § 5 ch 73 SLA 1994)

Administrative Code. —

For commercial fishing loans, see 3 AAC 80.

Sec. 16.10.330.
Sale or transfer of mortgages, bonds and notes. [Repealed, § 14 ch 122 SLA 1980.]

Sec. 16.10.333.
Loans for purchase of Alaska limited entry permits.

Loans under AS

16.10.310(a)

may be made to an individual commercial fisherman for the purchase of a limited entry permit upon certification by the commission that the fisherman is a person who qualifies as a transferee for the permit under AS 16.43 and the regulations adopted by the commission.

Upon approval by the commissioner, the permit to be purchased may be pledged as security for a loan under (a) of this section, if

the certificate for the pledged permit lists the commissioner as the legal owner of the permit;

the certificate for the pledged permit lists the debtor as the equitable owner of the permit;

all annual permit cards issued under the pledged permit list the name of the debtor;

all obligations and responsibilities of a permit owner are assumed by the debtor;

co-signers or other sureties for performance under the note are not vested with any rights in the pledged permit and their obligation is limited to satisfaction of the note and payment of costs directly incurred by the department in administering the loan.

The commissioner is not liable for any act or omission resulting from permit ownership nor will that act or omission affect the commissioner’s title to the permit or the commissioner’s rights under it.

Upon satisfaction of the note by the debtor, the commissioner shall certify to the commission that the note has been satisfied.

Upon certification as provided in (d) of this section, the commission shall amend the permit certificate to list the debtor as the legal owner.

[Repealed, § 34 ch 79 SLA 1985.]

History.

(§ 4 ch 83 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 106 SLA 1980; am §§ 8, 34 ch 79 SLA 1985)

Cross references. —

For the reassignment of entry permits taken as security for loans after such permits are revoked, see AS

16.43.960(i)

.

Administrative Code. —

For transfer of entry and interim-use permits, see 20 AAC 5, art. 17.

Sec. 16.10.335.
Default and foreclosure.

If the debtor defaults upon a note for which a limited entry permit has been pledged as security under AS

16.10.333

or

16.10.338

, the commissioner shall provide the debtor, by both certified and first class mail sent to the debtor’s last known address on file with the commissioner, with a notice of default that includes

a description of the security given for the note including the number assigned to the pledged permit by the commission;

the date upon which the default occurred;

the amount of the debtor’s outstanding principal and interest as of the date of the default notice, the total amount remaining on the note less unearned interest, and the amount of daily interest;

a statement that the debtor may, within 15 days after the postmark date of the notice, request a hearing to submit evidence showing the debtor has not defaulted;

a statement that the note may be reinstated if it is brought current within 120 days after the postmark date of the notice;

a statement that, under AS

16.10.310(a)(4)

, the debtor may reinstate the note by submitting to the commissioner a plan of repayment if the commissioner accepts the debtor’s plan of repayment;

the place where reinstatement of the note or payment in full may be made; and

a notice in at least 10-point bold type stating: IMPORTANT: YOUR FAILURE TO REINSTATE OR PAY THIS NOTE IN FULL BY THE DATE SPECIFIED WILL RESULT IN A FORFEITURE OF ALL RIGHTS TO THE PERMIT AND THE POSSIBILITY OF LEGAL ACTION BEING INSTITUTED AGAINST YOU.

In each case of a limited entry permit being pledged as security under AS

16.10.333

or

16.10.338

, the debtor shall maintain on file with the department an address where notice of default is to be sent, if necessary, and where that notice will be timely received by the debtor.

Upon presentation of evidence of mailing in accordance with (a) of this section, the receipt of the notice of default by the debtor will be presumed for all purposes. This presumption is rebuttable by presentation of evidence sufficient to demonstrate lack of receipt of notice through no fault of the debtor. Upon presentation of evidence sufficient to prove lack of receipt of notice through no fault of the debtor, the notice is a nullity.

If requested by the debtor, the commissioner may waive any of the time limits in (a) of this section for a period not to exceed 60 days if

the debtor demonstrates good cause for the waiver; and

the commissioner sets out in writing the reasons for approving the waiver.

Except as otherwise provided in (c) and (d) of this section, if the debtor fails to reinstate or satisfy the note within the time specified in (a)(5) of this section, the debtor’s interest in the permit is terminated by operation of law without further notice.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, when a debtor files bankruptcy, the debtor’s interest in the limited entry permit is terminated by operation of law without further notice as of the date that the automatic stay issued in the bankruptcy is no longer in effect, unless the debtor has reaffirmed the debt.

If a limited entry permit that has been pledged as security under AS

16.10.333

or

16.10.338

is revoked under AS

16.43.970

, the debtor’s interest in the permit is terminated by operation of law without further notice as of the date that the revocation takes effect.

History.

(§ 4 ch 83 SLA 1978; am § 9 ch 72 SLA 1979; am §§ 3, 4 ch 7 SLA 1983; am § 9 ch 79 SLA 1985; am §§ 1 — 4 ch 84 SLA 1991; am § 3 ch 110 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For repossessed property, see 3 AAC 77.

For commercial fishing loans, see 3 AAC 80.

Sec. 16.10.337.
Deficiencies and transfer of entry permits after foreclosure.

Upon a foreclosure on an entry permit as provided in AS

16.10.335

or the termination of a debtor’s interest in an entry permit under AS

16.10.335(g)

, the commissioner shall offer the commission a right of first refusal if the permit is subject to a buy-back program under AS

16.43.290

—

16.43.330

at a price equal to the amount outstanding on the note plus any costs the department directly incurred in administering the loan.

If the commission does not exercise its right of first refusal within 30 days after it receives the offer, or if the permit is not subject to a buy-back program under AS

16.43.290

—

16.43.330

, the department shall advertise and sell the permit. If the proceeds of the sale of a permit exceed the amount necessary to pay the note in full, plus penalties, costs of administration of the note, attorney fees, and child support liens of which the department has notice, the excess shall be transferred by the commissioner to the debtor. At any time until the permit has been sold under this subsection, the debtor may repurchase the permit by paying the department the amount necessary to pay the note in full, plus penalties, costs of administration of the note, and attorney fees, as determined by the commissioner.

[Repealed, § 72 ch 113 SLA 1982.]

Nothing in this section affects the right of the commissioner to institute legal action for a deficiency resulting from a default on a note given under AS

16.10.333

. In addition to any deficiency, the debtor is liable for the costs of administering the note and for costs and attorney fees.

History.

(§ 4 ch 83 SLA 1978; am § 72 ch 113 SLA 1982; am § 5 ch 7 SLA 1983; am § 4 ch 110 SLA 1998; am § 3 ch 56 SLA 2003)

Cross references. —

For the reassignment of entry permits taken as security for loans after such permits are revoked, see AS

16.43.960(i)

.

Administrative Code. —

For repossessed property, see 3 AAC 77.

Sec. 16.10.338.
Entry permits as collateral.

Alaska limited entry permits may be used as security for loans under AS

16.10.310(a)

. The provisions of AS

16.10.335

and

16.10.337

apply to Alaska limited entry permits pledged as security for loans in accordance with this section.

If a limited entry permit is pledged for security for a loan made under AS

16.10.310(a)(1)(B)

for the repair, restoration, upgrading, construction, or purchase of a vessel and the borrower thereafter fails to make a payment or defaults, the commissioner shall, in addition to the notice provided under AS

16.10.335(a)

, notify the borrower that subject to the commissioner’s acceptance the borrower may sell the vessel, apply the sales proceeds to the debt, and renegotiate payment of the balance due on the loan to avoid the immediate loss of the limited entry permit that has been pledged for security for the loan.

If a limited entry permit is pledged for security for a loan made under AS

16.10.310(a)(1)(C)

for the purchase of quota shares and the borrower thereafter fails to make a payment or defaults, the commissioner shall, in addition to the notice provided under AS

16.10.335(a)

, notify the borrower that subject to the commissioner’s acceptance the borrower may sell the quota shares, apply the sales proceeds to the debt, and renegotiate payment of the balance due on the loan to avoid the immediate loss of the limited entry permit that has been pledged for security for the loan.

History.

(§ 10 ch 72 SLA 1979; am § 5 ch 84 SLA 1991; am § 6 ch 73 SLA 1994)

Sec. 16.10.339.
Regulations.

The department shall adopt regulations to implement AS

16.10.333

—

16.10.337

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 83 SLA 1978; am § 10 ch 79 SLA 1985)

Administrative Code. —

For repossessed property, see 3 AAC 77.

For commercial fishing loans, see 3 AAC 80.

For transfer of entry and interim-use permits, see 20 AAC 5, art. 17.

Sec. 16.10.340.
Commercial fishing revolving loan fund.

There is a commercial fishing revolving loan fund to carry out the purpose of AS

16.10.300

—

16.10.370

.

Money in the fund may be used by the legislature to make appropriations for costs of administering AS

16.10.300

—

16.10.370

.

If the commissioner determines that the fund contains money that is excess to that needed to carry out the purpose of AS

16.10.300

—

16.10.370

, then the commissioner may use the excess money to carry out the purpose of AS

16.10.500

—

16.10.560

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 134 SLA 1972; am § 2 ch 177 SLA 1976; am § 24 ch 36 SLA 1990; am § 5 ch 62 SLA 1994; am §§ 5, 6 ch 58 SLA 2012)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 63, ch. 113, SLA 1982, provides: “All assets of the fishermen’s mortgage and note fund (AS

16.10.650

) (now repealed) are transferred to the commercial fishing revolving loan fund (AS

16.10.340

). Repayments of principal and interest on loans made from the fishermen’s mortgage and note fund shall be deposited into the commercial fishing revolving loan fund by the commissioner of the Department of Commerce and Economic Development as they are received.”

Sec. 16.10.342.
Foreclosure expense account.

There is established as a special account within the commercial fishing revolving loan fund the foreclosure expense account.

[Repealed, § 72 ch 113 SLA 1982.]

The commissioner may expend money credited to the foreclosure expense account when necessary to protect the state’s security interest in collateral on loans granted under AS

16.10.300

—

16.10.370

or to defray expenses incurred during foreclosure proceedings after a default by an obligor.

History.

(§ 4 ch 83 SLA 1978; am § 72 ch 113 SLA 1982; am §§
7, 8 ch 58 SLA 2012)

Administrative Code. —

For repossessed property, see 3 AAC 77.

Sec. 16.10.345.
Community quota entity revolving loan fund.

History.

[Repealed, § 14 ch 58 SLA 2012]

Sec. 16.10.350.
Administration of fund.

The commissioner shall administer the commercial fishing revolving loan fund.

The commissioner shall annually prepare a report detailing the number and nature of reinstatements authorized by AS

16.10.335(a)(5)

and notify the legislature that the report is available.

History.

(§ 1 ch 134 SLA 1972; am § 6 ch 84 SLA 1991; am § 20 ch 21 SLA 1995; am §§ 10, 11 ch 58 SLA 2012)

Sec. 16.10.353.
Waiver of confidentiality.

The commissioner may release information about a borrower’s loan to any individual when release of the information has been authorized by the borrower.

A person obtaining a loan under AS

16.10.300

—

16.10.370

after June 28, 1991 may, by signing a form prepared for the purpose, designate the names of persons and organizations to whom a copy of the notice required by AS

16.10.335

must be sent.

History.

(§ 7 ch 84 SLA 1991)

Sec. 16.10.355.
Disposal of property acquired by default or foreclosure.

The department shall dispose of property acquired through default or foreclosure of a loan made under AS

16.10.300

—

16.10.370

or former AS

16.10.650

— 16.10.720. Disposal shall be made in a manner that serves the best interests of the state, and may include the amortization of payments over a period of years, but may not be by lease.

History.

(§ 11 ch 79 SLA 1985)

Administrative Code. —

For repossessed property, see 3 AAC 77.

Sec. 16.10.360.
Definitions.

In AS

16.10.300

—

16.10.370

,

“commission” means the Alaska Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development;

“debtor” means an individual commercial fisherman who either initially contracts for a loan under AS

16.10.333

—

16.10.337

or assumes a loan as provided in those sections;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development;

“quota share” means a transferable license, permit, or right issued by the federal government that conveys a right to engage in a fishery in or off Alaska and to take a specified portion of the annual harvest quota for that fishery.

History.

(§ 1 ch 134 SLA 1972; am § 5 ch 83 SLA 1978; am § 7 ch 73 SLA 1994)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” and “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development” and “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Cross references. —

For further definitions, see AS

16.05.940

.

Sec. 16.10.370.
Short title.

AS

16.10.300

—

16.10.370

may be cited as the Commercial Fishing Loan Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 134 SLA 1972)